Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 5. Telecommunications Relay Service.

§§ 56-484.4 through 56-484.6.
Repealed by Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 2, effective January 1, 2007. For expiration of repeal, see Editor’s notes.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4, provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6, provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8, provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9, provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

Prior to their repeal January 1, 2007, §§ 56-484.4 through 56-484.6 read as follows:

“

§ 56-484.4. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:

‘Department’ means the Department for the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing.

‘Operation’ means those functions reasonably and directly necessary for the provision of telecommunications relay service, including contract procurement and administration, and public education and information regarding such service.

‘Telecommunications relay service’ means a facility whereby a person who has a hearing or speech disability using a text telephone and a person using a conventional telephone device can communicate with each other via telephone.

‘Telephone company’ means a certificated local exchange telephone company, or any county, city or town that has obtained a certificate pursuant to § 56-265.4:4, which owns, manages, or controls any plant or equipment or any part of a plant or equipment
within the Commonwealth for the conveyance of telephone messages, either directly or indirectly.

‘Voice carry over’ means technology that will enable a deaf or hard-of-hearing person with good speech to use his voice, instead of the text telephone, to communicate back to the hearing person. (1990, c. 465; 1992, c. 549; 1996, c. 68; 2002, cc. 479,
489.)

§ 56-484.5. Provision of service; minimum standards.
— The Department, with the assistance of the Commission, shall be responsible for the provision and operation of telecommunications relay service for all text telephones within the Commonwealth. Such service shall include
at a minimum:

Twenty-four-hour-a-day, seven-day-a-week statewide access with no limitations or restrictions that are not applicable to voice users of the telephone network;

An answer rate that ensures that at least eighty-five percent of the incoming calls are operator-answered within twenty seconds and at least ninety-nine percent of incoming calls answered within sixty seconds;

Technological advances, including the capability of voice carry over; and

Adequate facilities and personnel to ensure that calls are interpreted accurately; notwithstanding this provision, unless miscommunication on a call is caused by the willful misconduct of the telecommunications relay service provider, liability of the
telecommunications relay service provider shall be limited to the charges imposed on users for the call. (1990, c. 465; 1992, c. 549; 1996, c. 68.)

§ 56-484.6. Funding.
— A. All costs associated with the establishment and operation of the telecommunications relay service, including but not limited to personnel costs incurred by the Department for administering the service, shall be funded
through an assessment made by the Commission to telephone companies and any money transferred from the Department as provided for in subsection C of this section. The Commission shall consider market share, revenue, number of customers,
and any other factors the Commission considers relevant in fairly apportioning such costs among the companies; such assessments, when appropriate, may be zero. The assessments shall be based on projected costs and special interim assessments
may be made if actual costs exceed projections. No assessment shall be made and no funds shall be expended to support any activities which are not reasonably and directly necessary for the operation of the telecommunications relay
service as defined herein.

B. In order to defray the assessments referred to in subsection A of this section, the Commission shall authorize such rate surcharges as it deems reasonable. Each telephone company shall be allowed a commission, as determined by the Commission not to
exceed three percent of the surcharge, to cover the costs associated with the collection of the surcharge.

C. The Department shall transfer any funds received from the National Exchange Carrier Association, or other funding sources for purposes of operating telecommunications relay services, to the Commission for costs associated with telecommunications relay
service. (1990, c. 465; 1992, c. 549; 1996, c. 68.)”

§ 56-484.7.
Repealed by Acts 1996, c. 68.